Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-615
Officers and employees of county; transfer to authority; effect.

Officers and employees of any board or department in or of a county may be transferred to the authority established in the county, and shall be eligible for such transfer and appointment without examination to offices and positions under the authority. Officers or employees of such county, who shall have accepted such transfer and who are at the time of such transfer members or beneficiaries of any existing pension or retirement system, shall continue to have the rights, privileges, obligations, and status with respect to such system or systems as are now prescribed by law.

Laws 1969, c. 141, § 15, p. 656.